Indiana, session 2026, SB190.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 35-31.5-2-67.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 67.7. "Counterfeit gift card", for
purposes of IC 35-43-4-10, has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-43-4-10(a).
SECTION 2. IC 35-31.5-2-143.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 143.6. "Gift card", for purposes
of IC 35-43-4-10, has the meaning set forth in IC 35-43-4-10(a).
SECTION 3. IC 35-31.5-2-143.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 143.8. "Gift card redemption
information", for purposes of IC 35-43-4-10, has the meaning set
forth in IC 35-43-4-10(a).
SECTION 4. IC 35-43-4-10 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) The following definitions apply throughout
2026 IN 190—LS 6923/DI 149


this section:
(1) "Counterfeit gift card" means:
(A) an object that is not a gift card but contains identifying
information that purports to be a gift card; or
(B) a gift card that has been tampered with or altered.
(2) "Gift card" means a card, code, or other object that is:
(A) activated or inactive;
(B) issued on a prepaid basis in a specified amount; and
(C) redeemable for specified goods or services.
(3) "Gift card redemption information" means:
(A) the digital data contained within a gift card's magnetic
strip or chip; or
(B) information that is unique to a gift card that allows a
person to access, transfer, or spend the funds that are on
the gift card.
(b) A person who knowingly or intentionally exerts
unauthorized control over:
(1) a gift card; or
(2) gift card redemption information;
commits gift card theft, a Class A misdemeanor. However, the
offense is a Level 6 felony if the person has a prior unrelated
conviction under this subsection.
(c) A person who knowingly or intentionally:
(1) creates or possesses a counterfeit gift card;
(2) places a counterfeit gift card in a retail location where a
consumer would customarily purchase a gift card; or
(3) tampers with a gift card or gift card redemption
information;
commits gift card fraud, a Level 6 felony. However, the offense is
a Level 5 felony if the person has a prior unrelated conviction
under this subsection.
2026 IN 190—LS 6923/DI 149